District of Columbia statutes.
1-610.62

Retirement benefits.

Executive Service employees shall be covered under subchapter XXVI of this chapter, except that employees first hired after September 30, 1987, may elect to participate in the District’s defined contribution plan or may elect to have the funds that would otherwise be contributed by the District under the defined contribution plan directed to another 401(a) retirement plan.

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 1062
as added June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-124, § 101(m), 45 DCR 2464
1981 Ed., § 1-611.62.
Applicability of § 101(m) of D.C. Law 12-124: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 1-610.51.